Hawaii statutes.
[§658G-2]
Definitions. As used in this chapter:

"Collaborative law communication"
means a statement, whether oral or in a record, or verbal or nonverbal, that:

(1) Is made to conduct, participate in, continue, or
reconvene a collaborative law process; and

(2) Occurs after the parties sign a collaborative law
participation agreement and before the collaborative law process is concluded.

"Collaborative law participation
agreement" means an agreement by persons to participate in a collaborative
law process.

"Collaborative law process" means a
procedure intended to resolve a collaborative matter without intervention by a
tribunal in which persons:

(1) Sign a collaborative law participation agreement;
and

(2) Are represented by collaborative lawyers.

"Collaborative lawyer" means a lawyer
who represents a party in a collaborative law process.

"Collaborative matter" means a
dispute, transaction, claim, problem, or issue for resolution including a
dispute, claim, or issue in a proceeding which is described in a collaborative
law participation agreement.

"Law firm" means:

(1) Lawyers who practice law together in a
partnership, professional corporation, sole proprietorship, limited liability
company, or association;

(2) Lawyers employed in a legal services
organization;

(3) Lawyers employed in the legal department of a
corporation or other organization; or

(4) Lawyers employed in the legal department of a
government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

"Nonparty participant" means a person,
other than a party and the party's collaborative lawyer, that participates in a
collaborative law process.

"Party" means a person that signs a
collaborative law participation agreement and whose consent is necessary to
resolve a collaborative matter.

"Person" means an individual,
corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or
commercial entity.

"Proceeding" means:

(1) A judicial, administrative, arbitral, or other
adjudicative process before a tribunal, including related prehearing and
post-hearing motions, conferences, and discovery; or

(2) A legislative hearing or similar process.

"Prospective party" means a person
that discusses with a prospective collaborative lawyer the possibility of
signing a collaborative law participation agreement.

"Record" means information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"Related to a collaborative matter"
means involving the same parties, transaction or occurrence, nucleus of
operative fact, dispute, claim, or issue as the collaborative matter.

"Sign" means, with present intent, to
authenticate or adopt a record:

(1) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

(2) To attach to or logically associate with the
record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

"Tribunal" means:

(1) A court, arbitrator, administrative agency, or
other body acting in an adjudicative capacity which, after presentation of
evidence or legal argument, has jurisdiction to render a decision affecting a
party's interests in a matter; or

(2) A legislative body conducting a hearing or
similar process. [L 2012, c 207, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next